test/src/morphology/mrj1933-test-V-sirash_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - сирэм: # Verb-em '??'
     сирэм+V+Ind+NonPst+Sg1: сирэм
     сирэм+V+Ind+NonPst+Sg2: сирэт
     сирэм+V+Ind+NonPst+Sg3: сирӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+NonPst+Pl1: сирэнӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+NonPst+Pl2: сирэдӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+NonPst+Pl3: сирӓт
     сирэм+V+Ind+NonPst+ConNeg: сирӹ
     сирэм+V+Ind+NonPst+Pl3+ConNeg: сирэп
#
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: сирӹшӹм
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: сирӹшӹц
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: сирӹш
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: сирӹшнӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: сирӹштӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: сирэвӹ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: сирӹ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: сирэп
#
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: сирэнӓм
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: сирэнӓт
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: сирэн
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: сирэннӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: сирэндӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: сирэнӹт

##
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Sg1: сирӓлтӓлӹнӓм
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Sg3: сирӓлтӓлӹнӓт
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Sg3: сирӓлтӓлӹн
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Pl1: сирӓлтӓлӹннӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлӹндӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлӹнӹт
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+ConNeg: сирӓлтӓл
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Pl3+ConNeg: сирӓлтӓлэп

     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Sg1: сирӓлтӓльӹм
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Sg3: сирӓлтӓльӹц
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Sg3: сирӓлтӓльӹ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Pl1: сирӓлтӓлнӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлдӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлӹнӹт
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+ConNeg: сирӓлтӓл
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: сирӓлӓлэп
#
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Sg1: сирӓлтӓлӹнӓм
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Sg3: сирӓлтӓлӹнӓт
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Sg3: сирӓлтӓлӹн
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Pl1: сирӓлтӓлӹннӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлӹндӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлӹнӹт
#
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Sg1: сирӓлтӓлӓм
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Sg3: сирӓлтӓлӓт
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Sg3: сирӓлтӓлэш
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Pl1: сирӓлтӓлӹнӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлӹда
     сирэм+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлӹт
##
     сирэм+V+Imprt+Sg3: сирӹ
     сирэм+V+Imprt+Sg3: сирӹжӹ
     сирэм+V+Imprt+Pl3: сирӹдӓ
     сирэм+V+Imprt+Pl3: сирӹштӹ
##
     сирэм+V+Imprt1+Sg2: сирэмӓ
     сирэм+V+Imprt1+Pl2: сирэмӓдӓ
##
     сирэм+V+Idal+Imprt1+Sg2: сирӓлтӓлмӓ
     сирэм+V+Idal+Imprt1+Sg3: сирӓлтӓлжӹ
     сирэм+V+Idal+Imprt1+Pl2: сирӓлтӓлдӓ
     сирэм+V+Idal+Imprt1+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлӹштӹ

##
     сирэм+V+Imprt1+Sg2+Foc/йӓ: сирэмӓйӓ
     сирэм+V+Imprt1+Pl2+Foc/йӓ: сирэмӓдӓйӓ
##
     сирэм+V+Idal+Imprt1+Sg2+Foc/йӓ: сирӓлтӓлмӓйӓ
     сирэм+V+Idal+Imprt1+Sg3+Foc/йӓ: сирӓлтӓлжӹйӓ
     сирэм+V+Idal+Imprt1+Pl2+Foc/йӓ: сирӓлтӓлдӓйӓ
     сирэм+V+Idal+Imprt1+Pl3+Foc/йӓ: сирӓлӓлтӓлӹштӹйӓ

##
     сирэм+V+Des+Sg1: сирӹнэм
     сирэм+V+Des+Sg3: сирӹнэт
     сирэм+V+Des+Sg3: сирӹнэжӹ
     сирэм+V+Des+Pl1: сирӹнэнӓ
     сирэм+V+Des+Pl3: сирӹнэдӓ
     сирэм+V+Des+Pl3: сирӹнэштӹ
##
     сирэм+V+Idal+Des+Sg1: сирӓлтӓлнэм
     сирэм+V+Idal+Des+Sg3: сирӓлтӓлнэт
     сирэм+V+Idal+Des+Sg3: сирӓлтӓлнэжӹ
     сирэм+V+Idal+Des+Pl1: сирӓлтӓлнэнӓ
     сирэм+V+Idal+Des+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлнэдӓ
     сирэм+V+Idal+Des+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлнэштӹ

##
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: сирӹдэлӓм
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: сирӹдэлӓт
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: сирӹдэ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: сирӹдэлнӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: сирӹдэлдӓ
     сирэм+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: сирӹдэлӹт

#
     сирэм+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: сирӓлтӓлтэлӓм
     сирэм+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: сирӓлтӓлтэлӓт
     сирэм+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: сирӓлтӓлтэ
     сирэм+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: сирӓлтӓлтэлнӓ
     сирэм+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлтэлдӓ
     сирэм+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: сирӓлтӓлтэлӹт
